Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 36 Motor Fuel Tax

31-36-1.
Definitions.

Terms in this chapter and chapter 37 of this title are construed as follows:

“Administrator” means the tax administrator.

“Distributor” includes any person, association of persons, firm, or corporation, wherever resident or located, who or that shall import, or cause to be imported into this state, for use or for sale, fuels, and also any person, association of persons, firm, or corporation who or that shall produce, refine, manufacture, or compound fuels within this state.

“Filling station” includes any place, location, or station where fuels are offered for sale at retail.

“Fuels” includes gasoline, benzol, naphtha, and other volatile and inflammable liquids (other than lubricating oils, diesel fuel for the propulsion of marine craft, fuels used for the propulsion of airplanes, oils used for heating purposes, manufactured biodiesel fuel as defined in subdivision (6)), used, or suitable for use, for operating or propelling motor vehicles with internal combustion engines. This does not include benzol and naphtha, sold or used for a purpose other than for the operation or propulsion of motor vehicles, or propane used for the generation of electricity. Any article or product, represented as gasoline, for use in internal combustion-type engines, used in motor vehicles, shall be equal to, or better, in quality and specification than that known as “United States government motor gasoline.”

“Investigator and examiner” means any person appointed by the tax administrator to act as an investigator and examiner.

“Manufactured biodiesel fuel” means: (i) Mono-alkyl esters of long-chain fatty acids derived from vegetable oils or animal fats that conform to ASTM D6751 specifications for use in diesel engines; (ii) That results in employment at a fixed location at a manufacturing facility for biodiesel fuel; and (iii) Any volume of biodiesel fuel that is subsequently blended with other fuels and is used for heating purposes, or for operating or propelling motor vehicles, notwithstanding the portion of biodiesel blended into any fuel, only the biodiesel portion of the fuel shall be exempt from taxation under this chapter.

“Owner” includes any person, association of persons, firm, or corporation offering fuels for sale at retail.

“Peddlers” means any person, association of persons, firm or corporation, except a distributor as defined in this chapter, who or that shall distribute gasoline by tank wagon in this state.

“Public highways” includes any state or other highway and any public street, avenue, alley, park, parkway, driveway, or public place in any city or town.

“Pump” includes any apparatus or machine for raising, driving, exhausting, or compressing fluids, and used in the sale and distribution of fuels.

“Purchaser” includes any person, association of persons, firm, or corporation, wherever resident or located, who or that purchases fuels from a distributor, for use or resale, and any person, association of persons, firm, or corporation who or that purchases from a distributor, gasoline or other volatile and inflammable liquids (other than lubricating oils and oils used for heating purposes) for use other than for propelling motor vehicles.

“Retail dealer” means any person, association of persons, firm, or corporation operating a filling station, as herein defined in this chapter, for the sale or dispensing of motor fuel by delivery into service tank, or tanks, of any highway motor vehicle that is propelled by an internal-combustion motor, other than the highway motor vehicle belonging to the person owning or operating the place of business; provided, however, that sales by a manufacturer or distributor shall not constitute them retail dealers.

“State highways” includes only those public highways, or those parts of them, that shall be constructed or maintained by the department of transportation.

“United States government motor gasoline” means that gasoline that is, or may be, prescribed by the federal specification board of the United States government for use as a fuel for motor vehicle, motor boat, and similar engines.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 1; P.L. 1937, ch. 2509, § 1; P.L. 1937, ch. 2510, §§ 1, 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 1; P.L. 1939, ch. 659, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 70; P.L. 1939, ch. 746, § 1; P.L. 1940, ch. 822, § 1; P.L. 1950, ch. 2547, § 1; P.L. 1955, ch. 3583, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-1

; P.L. 1996, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 205, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 168, § 2; P.L. 2004, ch. 484, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 348, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 429, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 24; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 24; P.L. 2009, ch. 129, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 168, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 388, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 403, § 1.

31-36-2.
Registration of distributors required.

Every distributor shall, before continuing or commencing to transact the business of a distributor, apply for registration as a distributor at the office of the tax administrator upon a form to be obtained from the administrator and the administrator. If satisfied as to the facts stated in application, shall register the distributor and issue a certificate of the registration without charge, which registration shall entitle the distributor to continue or to commence to engage in the business within this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 2; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 70; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-2

.

31-36-3.
Bond of a motor fuel distributor.

Before the division of taxation shall register a distributor as provided in §

31-36-2

, the distributor shall deposit with the Division of Taxation a surety bond running to the general treasurer and in form and substance approved by the division, in amount based upon an estimate of the average annual tax to be paid by the distributor as set forth in subsection (b) of this section, with any surety, if any, that the division may require, conditioned to pay any final judgment obtained against the principal named in the bond for failure to pay any and all taxes assessed under the provisions of this chapter. Provided, however, that any distributor that has paid all taxes assessed under this chapter for three (3) consecutive years shall be exempt from depositing a surety bond thereafter as long as the distributor remains in good standing. In the event a distributor fails to remain in good standing the division shall notify the distributor of the requirement to obtain a new surety bond that must be secured within thirty (30) days of said notice. Any distributor that fails to secure the bond as required under this section shall forfeit its certificate of registration, provided for in §

31-36-2

, until such time as the division receives proof that the bond has been secured.

In no event shall the amount of the bond in this section exceed five million dollars ($5,000,000).

AVERAGE ESTIMATE OF ANNUAL TAXES AMOUNT OF BOND $0 to $ 1,000,000 $ 250,000 $ to $ 1,500,000 1,000,001 $ 350,000 $ to $ 2,000,000 1,500,001 $ 500,000 $ to $ 2,500,000 2,000,001 $ 600,000 $ to $ 3,000,000 2,500,001 $ 700,000 $ to $ 5,000,000 3,000,001 $ 1,000,000 $ to $ 10,000,000 5,000,001 $ 2,000,000 $ 10,000,001 to $ 15,000,000 $ 3,000,000 $ 15,000,001 to $ 25,000,000 $ 4,000,000 $ 25,000,001 and Over $ 5,000,000

Click to view

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 2; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 2; P.L. 1953, ch. 3177, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-3

; P.L. 1962, ch. 63, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 165, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 24, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 490, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 520, § 1.

31-36-4.
Suspension or revocation of registration.

The administrator may suspend or revoke a registration of any distributor after a hearing, upon not less than five (5) days’ notice, for any violation of the provisions of this chapter, and may require a return of the distributor’s certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 2; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 70; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-4

.

31-36-5.
Measurement and marking of capacity of vehicles for transportation of fuels.

The capacity of every vehicle tank, and each compartment of it used for the transportation of fuels, shall be measured and sealed by an official sealer of weights and measures, and the capacity when so determined shall be plainly printed upon the right hand side of the vehicle tank in letters and numerals not less than one inch (1") in height.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 3; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-5

.

31-36-6.
Distributors’ sales records.

Every distributor shall keep a complete and accurate record of the number of gallons of fuels sold by the distributor and of the number of gallons of fuels used by the distributor, the date of the sales and of any use and, except in the case of retail sales through filling stations operated by the distributor, the names and addresses of the purchasers. The record shall be in a form and contain any information that the administrator may prescribe. Every distributor shall make for every sale of fuels, except retail sales through filling stations operated by the distributor, a written statement in duplicate containing the names and addresses of the distributor and the purchaser, the number of gallons sold and the dates of sale and delivery, one of which shall be delivered to the purchaser and the other retained by the distributor. Each record and statement shall be preserved by the distributor and purchaser for a period of three (3) years, and shall be open to inspection upon demand of the tax administrator or his or her authorized agents.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 3; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 70; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-6

; P.L. 1967, ch. 181, § 1.

31-36-7.
Monthly report of distributors — Payment of tax.

State requirements. Every distributor shall, on or before the twentieth (20th) day of each month, render a report to the tax administrator, upon forms to be obtained from the tax administrator, of the amount (number of gallons) of fuels purchased, sold, or used by the distributor within this state and the amount of fuels sold by the distributor without this state from fuels within this state during the preceding calendar month, and, if required by the tax administrator as to purchases, the name or names of the person or persons from whom purchased and the date and amount of each purchase, and as to sales, the name or names of the person or persons to whom sold and the amount of each sale, and shall pay at the same time to the administrator tax at the rate of thirty-two cents ($0.32) per gallon on all taxable gallons of fuel sold or used in this state.

Federal requirements. In the event the federal government requires a certain portion of the gasoline tax to be dedicated for highway improvements, then the state controller is directed to establish a restricted receipt account and deposit that portion of gasoline tax receipts which brings the state into federal compliance.

Beginning July 1, 2015, and every other year thereafter, the gasoline tax shall be adjusted by the percentage of increase in the Consumer Price Index for all Urban Consumers (CPI-U) as published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics determined as of September 30 of the prior calendar year; said adjustment shall be rounded to the nearest one cent ($.01) increment, provided that the total tax shall not be less than provided for in section (a).

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 4; P.L. 1927, ch. 1033, § 3; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 1; P.L. 1937, ch. 2500, § 1; P.L. 1938, ch. 2626, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 4; P.L. 1939, ch. 745, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1887, art. 4, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-7

; P.L. 1958, ch. 17, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 1960, ch. 77, art. 3, § 1; P.L. 1968, ch. 263, art. 7, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 260, art. 8, § 1; P.L. 1981, ch. 186, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 9, art. 2, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 344, art. 14, § 1; P.L. 1983, ch. 2, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 25, § 2; P.L. 1987, ch. 172, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 126, art. 19, § 1; P.L. 1991, ch. 6, art. 17, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 30, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 138, art. 89, § 1; P.L. 1994, ch. 134, § 19; P.L. 1997, ch. 30, art. 7, § 2; P.L. 1998, ch. 31, art. 6, § 2; P.L. 2002, ch. 65, art. 29, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 68, art. 16, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 145, art. 21, § 4.

31-36-8.
Declarations under penalty of perjury.

The oath or affirmation required by the provisions of this chapter or chapter 37 of this title as to any report or written statement shall not be required if the report or statement to be sworn to contains or is verified by a written declaration that it is made under the penalties of perjury. Whoever signs or issues the report or statement containing or verified by the written declaration shall, if the report or statement is willfully false, be guilty of perjury.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 4; P.L. 1939, ch. 745, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-8

.

31-36-9.
Assessment on determination of incorrectness of report or on failure to file report.

Deficiency determination; interest. If the tax administrator is not satisfied with any statement or report or the amount of tax paid to the tax administrator by any person, the tax administrator may compute and determine the amount required to be paid upon the basis of the facts contained in the statement or report or upon the basis of any information in the tax administrator’s possession or that may come into the tax administrator’s possession. One or more deficiency determinations may be made of the amount due for one or for more than one month. The amount of the determination, exclusive of penalties, shall bear interest at the annual rate provided by §

44-1-7

, as amended, from the twenty-fifth day after the close of the month for which the amount, or any portions of it, should have been paid until the date of payment.

Pecuniary penalties for deficiencies. If any part of the deficiency for which a deficiency determination is made is due to negligence or intentional disregard of the provisions of this chapter, a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the determination shall be added to it. If any part of the deficiency for which a deficiency determination is made is due to fraud or an intent to evade the provisions of this chapter, a penalty of fifty percent (50%) of the amount of the determination shall be added to it.

Notice of determination. The tax administrator shall give to the distributor or other person against whom any claim is asserted a written notice of the tax administrator’s determination. Except in the case of fraud, intent to evade the provisions of this article, failure to make a return, or claim for additional amount pursuant to subsections (6) to (9) of this section, every notice of a deficiency determination shall be mailed within three (3) years after the twenty-fifth day of the calendar month following the month for which the amount is proposed to be determined or within three (3) years after the return is filed, whichever period expires later, unless a longer period is agreed upon by the tax administrator and the taxpayer.

Determination without report; interest and penalties. If any person fails to file a report, the tax administrator shall make an estimate of the amount (number of gallons) of fuels purchased, sold or used which is subject to tax. The estimate shall be made for the month or months in respect to which the person failed to file a report and shall be based upon any information which is in the tax administrator’s possession or may come into the tax administrator’s possession. Upon the basis of this estimate, the tax administrator shall compute and determine the amount required to be paid to the state, adding to the sum thus arrived at a penalty equal to ten percent (10%) of it. One or more determinations may be made for one or for more than one month. The amount of the determination, exclusive of penalties, shall bear interest at the annual rate provided by §

44-1-7

, as amended, from the twenty-fifth day after the close of the month for which the amount or any portion of it should have been paid until the date of payment. If the failure of any person to file a report is due to fraud or an intent to evade the provisions of this chapter, a penalty of fifty percent (50%) of the amount required to be paid by the person, exclusive of penalties, shall be added to it in addition to the ten percent (10%) penalty provided in this section. After making his or her determination the tax administrator shall mail a written notice of the estimate, determination, and penalty.

Jeopardy determinations. If the tax administrator believes that collection of any tax or any amount of tax required to be collected and paid to the state or of any determination will be jeopardized by delay, the tax administrator shall thereupon make a determination of the tax or amount of tax required to be collected, including interest and penalties, if any, noting that fact upon the determination. The amount so determined shall be due and payable immediately upon the mailing by the tax administrator of the notice of that determination.

Finality of determination; time payment due. Unless a hearing shall have been requested as provided in subsection (7) of this section, any determination made by the tax administrator under subsections (1) — (4) of this section shall become final and shall be paid within ten (10) days after mailing by the tax administrator of the notice of the determination. If the determination is not so paid, a further penalty of ten percent (10%) of the amount of the determination, exclusive of interest and other penalties, shall be added to it.

Hearing by administrator on application. Any person aggrieved by any assessment, deficiency, or otherwise, shall notify the tax administrator in writing within thirty (30) days from the date of mailing by the tax administrator of the notice of the assessment and shall request a hearing relative to it. The tax administrator shall, as soon as practicable, fix a time and place for the hearing and shall, after the hearing, determine the correct amount of the tax, interest, and penalties; provided, that when a jeopardy assessment or determination shall be made the hearing shall not be had unless the jeopardy assessment with penalties and interest shall have been paid. The tax administrator may decrease or increase the amount of any determination.

Petition for judicial review; citation and hearing. After a hearing, and provided all taxes, interest, and penalties as determined by the tax administrator have been paid, any person aggrieved by the determination may, within fifteen (15) days from the date of mailing by the tax administrator of the determination, petition the sixth division of the district court, setting forth the reasons why the assessment is alleged to be erroneous and praying relief from it. The clerk of the court shall then issue a citation, substantially in the form provided in §

44-5-26

, to summon the tax administrator to answer the petition, and the court shall proceed to hear the petition and to determine the correct amount of the tax, interest, and penalties.

Judgment on review. If, upon final determination of the petition, it shall appear that the tax administrator’s assessment was correct, the court shall confirm the assessment; or, if incorrect, the court shall determine the proper amount of the tax, interest, and penalties, and it shall appear that the petitioner, by reason of the payment of the tax, interest, and penalties, is entitled to recover the payment or any part of it, the court may order a refund with interest at the annual rate provided by §

44-1-7

, as amended, or order a credit, as the circumstances may warrant. If a refund is so ordered, it shall be paid by the general treasurer upon certification of the tax administrator with the approval of the director of administration. If it shall appear that the state is entitled to a greater amount of tax, interest, and penalties than assessed or determined by the tax administrator and paid by the petitioner, the court shall order the payment by the petitioner of any additional amount that the court shall determine, and the petitioner shall immediately pay the amount to the tax administrator. A party aggrieved by a final order of the court may seek review thereof in the supreme court by writ of certiorari in accordance with the procedures contained in §

8-8-32

.

Interest and penalties on delinquent payments. Any person who fails to pay any tax to the state or any amount of tax required to be collected and paid to the state, except amounts of determinations made by the tax administrator under subsections (1) — (4) of this section within the time required, shall pay a penalty of ten percent (10%) of the tax or amount of the tax, in addition to the tax or amount of the tax, plus interest at the annual rate provided by §

44-1-7

, as amended, from the date on which the tax or amount of the tax required to be collected became due and payable to the state until date of payment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 4; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 1; P.L. 1937, ch. 2500, § 1; P.L. 1938, ch. 2626, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 4; P.L. 1939, ch. 745, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-9

; P.L. 1967, ch. 181, § 2; P.L. 1976, ch. 140, § 16; P.L. 1992, ch. 388, § 12; P.L. 1993, ch. 459, § 13.

31-36-10.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 6; P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 4; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 1; P.L. 1937, ch. 2500, § 1; P.L. 1938, ch. 2626, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 4; P.L. 1939, ch. 745, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-10

; Repealed by P.L. 1967, ch. 181, § 3.

31-36-11.
Interest on delinquent taxes — Actions for collections.

Any distributor failing to pay the tax provided for in this chapter when payable shall be liable for interest at the annual rate provided by §

44-1-7

, as amended, on the amount of the tax from the time when the tax shall become payable until the tax is paid, and suit for the collection of the tax and interest shall be initiated by the tax administrator, under the direction and supervision of the director of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 6; P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 4; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 1; P.L. 1937, ch. 2500, § 1; P.L. 1938, ch. 2626, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 4; P.L. 1939, ch. 745, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-11

; P.L. 1967, ch. 181, § 4; P.L. 1992, ch. 388, § 12.

31-36-11.1.
Interest on overpayments.

If it shall be determined that an overpayment has been made with respect to the tax provided for in this chapter, the amount of the overpayment shall bear interest at the annual rate established by §

44-1-7.1

. The acceptance of the check shall be without prejudice to any right of the taxpayer to claim any additional overpayment and interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 159, § 5; P.L. 1983, ch. 104, § 5.

31-36-12.
Tax as debt to state.

The tax imposed under the provisions of this chapter, together with all penalties, charges, and interest thereon shall also become, from the time the same are due and payable, a debt to the state of Rhode Island from the person or corporation liable for the payment of it.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 4; P.L. 1939, ch. 745, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-12

.

31-36-13.
Exemption and reimbursement for sales to United States or outside state — Emergency sales to other distributors.

Any person who shall purchase fuels upon which the tax provided in this chapter shall have been paid and shall sell the fuels outside this state or to the United States government, may be reimbursed the amount of the tax in the manner and subject to the conditions provided in this chapter. All claims for reimbursement shall be made under oath to the tax administrator upon forms to be obtained from the tax administrator, within two hundred forty (240) days from the date of the purchase of the fuels, and shall contain any information and proof that the tax administrator may require, that the claimant has paid the tax and that the fuels have been sold by the claimant outside this state or to the United States government. Claims for reimbursement shall be paid by the general treasurer from the general fund upon certification by the tax administrator and with the approval of the controller. However, any distributor shall be exempt from the payment of any tax on fuels sold by the distributor to the United States government or to a person, firm, or corporation who or which shall use the fuel solely for the operation of railroad transportation equipment on fixed rails or tracks, upon the presentation to the tax administrator by the distributor of proof satisfactory to the tax administrator as to the sale. Provided, that any distributor shall be exempt from the payment of any tax on fuels sold by the distributor to another distributor who is registered with the tax administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 5; P.L. 1930, ch. 1564, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 5; P.L. 1939, ch. 746, § 2; P.L. 1942, ch. 1212, art. 13, § 1; P.L. 1945, ch. 1600, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1975, § 1; P.L. 1953, ch. 3177, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-13

; P.L. 1965, ch. 69, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 61, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 154, § 1.

31-36-13.1.
Other exemptions.

Any distributor located in the town of New Shoreham shall be exempt at the point of purchase from the payment of any tax on fuel sold by the distributor directly, not at a filling station, to a person or entity who may file for a refund or reimbursement of motor fuel tax pursuant to §

31-36-15

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2003, ch. 415, § 1.

31-36-14.
Purchase for export by distributor licensed in another state.

Any distributor unlicensed in Rhode Island, who is a licensed distributor in a state outside of Rhode Island, may purchase fuels for export, tax free, after the distributor has first obtained a permit from the administrator for the exportation and shall comply with any rules and regulations that the administrator shall prescribe including the filing of a bond if required by the administrator.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 5; P.L. 1947, ch. 1975, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-14

; P.L. 1961, ch. 55, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 181, § 6.

31-36-15.
Refunds of motor fuel tax.

Commercial fishing operators who shall use fuels for propelling boats used principally in the business of commercial fishing for which certificates of registration have been issued by the department of environmental management for use in the commercial catching of marine fish, shellfish, or lobsters; (2) persons, firms, or corporations who or which shall use fuel for marine purposes, including in it fuel used in boats operated commercially for carrying passengers or freight but excluding from it fuels used in the operation or propulsion of pleasure craft, and further including persons, firms or corporations who purchase fuel for pumping, intaking, or discharging sea or bay waters for maintaining fish, shellfish, or lobsters; (3) lumber harvesters who shall use fuel for the operation of stationary engines, tractors, and other motor vehicles used in the course of lumbering in the forest or woods and which are not registered for use or used on public highways; (4) water well drillers who shall use fuel for the operation of stationary engines or drilling apparatus in the course of boring or drilling wells and not registered for use on the public highways; (5) farmers who shall use fuel for the operation of stationary engines, tractors, and other motor vehicles which are used in agricultural work on the farm of the claimant and which are not registered for use or used on public highways; (6) manufacturers who use fuels, except gasoline and diesel engine fuel, as industrial raw material and who use diesel engine fuel for the manufacture of power; and (7) municipalities and sewer commissions or their agencies which use fuel in the operation of stationary engines and motor vehicles which are not registered for use on public highways in the operation of sewer treatment plants; may file the claim for reimbursement of tax in the same manner as prescribed in §

31-36-13

, and shall be reimbursed by the state upon proof satisfactory to the tax administrator that the fuel was used as prescribed in this section.

No claim shall be filed if the reimbursement sought to be obtained amounts to less than one dollar ($1.00).

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 5; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1564, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 5; P.L. 1939, ch. 746, § 2; P.L. 1940, ch. 871, § 1; P.L. 1945, ch. 1600, § 1; P.L. 1947, ch. 1975, § 1; P.L. 1948, ch. 2095, § 1; P.L. 1949, ch. 2369, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-15

; P.L. 1964, ch. 184, § 1; P.L. 1967, ch. 181, § 5; P.L. 1977, ch. 154, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 402, § 1; P.L. 1988, ch. 381, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 147, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 205, § 1.

31-36-16.
Payment of tax by persons other than distributors.

Any person who shall receive fuels in any form and under any circumstances that shall preclude the collection of the tax provided for in this chapter, from the distributors, and shall then sell or use the fuels in any manner and under any circumstances that shall render the sale or use subject to the tax, shall be considered as a distributor, and shall make the same report, pay the same taxes, and be subject to all other provisions of this chapter relating to a distributor of the fuels; excepting, that the requirements under this chapter for the filing of a bond shall be discretionary with the tax administrator, and if the bond is required to be filed it shall be in an amount not to exceed seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000).

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 6; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 6; P.L. 1953, ch. 3177, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-16

; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 24, § 1.

31-36-17.
Carriers’ reports of deliveries.

Every railroad, common carrier, or person delivering fuels into this state shall immediately report the delivery in writing to the state administrator, stating the names and addresses of the consignor and the consignee, the date and place of delivery, and the number of gallons delivered.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 6; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 70; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-17

.

31-36-18.
Appeals involving licenses or registrations.

Any distributor, owner, or person aggrieved by any order of the administrator made under the provisions of this chapter or chapter 37 of this title, involving the issuance, suspension, or revocation of a license, permit, or certificate of registration or any other matter (but not including assessments of taxes, interest, and penalties) may appeal the order to the sixth division of the district court by filing within thirty (30) days from the date of the notice to the distributor, owner, or person of the issuance of the order appealed from, a petition in the court stating the grounds upon which the appeal is taken.

Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall cause thirty (30) days’ notice of the pendency of it to be given to the administrator by serving the administrator in the manner in which subpoenas in equity are served, with a certified copy of the petition, and the petition shall follow the course of equity so far as the same is applicable. Upon hearing the petition the court may review the evidence taken at a hearing, investigator and examiner’s reports, or other information upon which the administrator’s action was taken, and may in its discretion, affirm or overrule or modify the order of the administrator. The taking of the appeal shall not operate as a stay of the order of the administrator from which the appeal is taken, and the order shall remain in full force and effect during the dependency of the appeal unless otherwise ordered by the court.

A party aggrieved by a final order of the court may seek review of the order in the Supreme Court by writ of certiorari in accordance with the procedures contained in §

42-35-16

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 11; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 70; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-18

; P.L. 1967, ch. 181, § 7; P.L. 1976, ch. 140, § 16; P.L. 1982, ch. 388, § 21.

31-36-19.
Penalty for violations.

Any distributor, purchaser, owner, or other person who fails or refuses to furnish any report or statement required to be made, or who fails or refuses to furnish any other data required by the tax administrator, or who files any false or fraudulent report, or who violates any provision of this chapter or chapter 37 of this title for which no other penalty is provided, shall be guilty of a felony, and shall for each offense be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or be imprisoned for not exceeding one year, or be punished by both fine and imprisonment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 6; P.L. 1925, ch. 679, § 12; P.L. 1929, ch. 1405, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 45, § 8; G.L. 1956, §

31-36-19

; P.L. 1967, ch. 181, § 8; P.L. 1986, ch. 103, § 11.